Utah statutes.
63C-7-202.   Powers of the Utah Communications Agency Network.
The Utah Communications Agency Network shall have the power to:
(1)  sue and be sued in its own name;
(2)  have an official seal and power to alter that seal at will;
(3)  make and execute contracts and all other instruments necessary or
convenient for the performance of its duties and the exercise of its powers
and functions under this chapter, including contracts with private companies
licensed under Title 26, Chapter 8a, Utah Emergency Medical Services System
Act;
(4)  own, acquire, construct, operate, maintain, and repair a communications
network, and dispose of any portion of it;
(5)  borrow money and incur indebtedness;
(6)  issue bonds as provided in this chapter;
(7)  enter into agreements with public agencies, the state, and federal
government to provide communications network services on terms and conditions
it considers to be in the best interest of its members;
(8)  acquire, by gift, grant, purchase, or by exercise of eminent domain, any
real property or personal property in connection with the acquisition and
construction of a communications network and all related facilities and
rights-of-way which it owns, operates, and maintains;
(9)  contract with other public agencies, the state, or federal government to
provide public safety communications services in excess of those required to
meet the needs or requirements of its members and the state and federal
government if:
(a)  it is determined by the executive committee to be necessary to accomplish
the purposes and realize the benefits of this chapter; and
(b)  any excess is sold to other public agencies, the state, or federal
government and is sold on terms that assure that the cost of providing the
excess service will be received by the Utah Communications Agency Network; and
(10)  perform all other duties authorized by this chapter.
